Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act:

(1) Blind person means:

(a) A person having sight which is so defective as to seriously limit his or her ability to engage in the ordinary vocations and activities of life; or

(b) A person, to be eligible and licensed as a blind vending facility operator under section 71-8611:

(i) Having no greater than 20/200 central visual acuity in the better eye after correction; or

(ii) Having an equally disabling loss of the visual field in which the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees;

(2) Board means the governing board of the commission;

(3) Certified vocational rehabilitation counselor for the blind means a person who is certified to practice vocational rehabilitation counseling for blind persons and holds a certificate issued by the commission;

(4) Commission means the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired;

(5) Committee of Blind Vendors means the committee created pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 107b-1;

(6) State workforce investment board means the board authorized by the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 and established in Nebraska;

(7) Vending facility means:

(a) Cafeterias, snackbars, cart services, shelters, counters, shelving, display and wall cases, refrigerating apparatus, and other appropriate auxiliary equipment necessary for the vending of articles approved by the office, agency, or person having control of the property on which the vending facility is located; and

(b) Manual or coin-operated vending machines or similar devices for vending articles approved by the office, agency, or person having control of the property on which the vending facility is located;

(8) Vending facility program means the program established and maintained pursuant to section 71-8611; and

(9) Vocational rehabilitation counseling for the blind means the process implemented by a person who operates a comprehensive and coordinated program designed to assist blind persons to gain remunerative employment, to enlarge economic opportunities for blind persons, to increase the available occupational range and diversity for blind persons, and to stimulate other efforts that aid blind persons in becoming self-supporting.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 55, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB445, § 2.